Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6170 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fighting Chance
for Firefighters Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6171 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Cancer centers in the State of Oklahoma may carry out the
purposes and functions of the Fighting Chance for Firefighters Act
to cover the costs of occupational cancer screenings.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1315, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1315. A. Upon application in writing and subject to
any underwriting criteria that may be established by the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services Oklahoma Health Care Authority,
the Office Authority may extend the benefits of the Oklahoma
Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans to employees who are employed
in positions requiring actual performance of duty during not less
than one thousand (1,000) hours per year and to all full-time
employees of:
1. Any of the following groups which participate in the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System:
a. county,
b. city,
c. town,
d. public trust for which the state is the primary
beneficiary, or
e. conservation districts; and
2. Any of the following groups:
a. county hospital,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. rural water district, including employees and board
members,
c. sewer district,
d. gas district,
e. solid waste management district,
f. nonprofit water corporation employees and board
members,
g. conservancy district or master conservancy district
authorized by the provisions of Section 541 of Title
82 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
h. voluntary organization of Oklahoma local government
jurisdictions listed in Section 2003 of Title 62 of
the Oklahoma Statutes including any council created by
the voluntary organizations,
i. voluntary association designated to administer the
County Government Council as authorized in Section 7
of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
j. statewide nonprofit entities representing employees of
the state or employees of local political subdivisions
who are eligible for insurance benefits authorized by
the provisions of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and
Benefits Act, or


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

k. statewide nonprofit entities receiving state funds to
provide no cost legal services to low income and
senior citizens,
l. municipal fire departments organized pursuant to
Section 29-101 et seq. of Title 11 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or
m. county fire departments organized pursuant to Section
351 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Applications to participate in the Oklahoma Employees
Insurance and Benefits Plans shall be approved by majority action of
the governing body of the groups listed in subsection A of this
section.
C. Groups listed in subsection A of this section participating
in the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans shall pay all
costs attributable to their participation. The benefits of said
plans for a participant provided coverage pursuant to this section
shall be the same and shall include the same plan options as would
be made available to a state employee participating in the plan that
resided at the same location. The premium for participating groups
listed in subsection A of this section shall be the same as paid by
state and education employees.
D. Participating groups listed in subsection A of this section
shall not be required to offer dental insurance as defined in
paragraph 11 12 of Section 1303 of this title, or other insurance as
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

defi ned in paragraph 12 13 of Section 1303 of this title. However,
if dental insurance or any other insurance is offered, it must be
provided to all eligible employees. If an employee retires and
begins to receive benefits from the Oklahoma Public Employees
Retirement System or terminates service and has a vested benefit
with the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, the employee
may elect, in the manner provided in Section 1316.2 of this title,
to participate in the dental insurance plan offered through the
Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act within thirty (30)
days from the date of termination of employment. The employee shall
pay the full cost of the dental insurance.
E. 1. Any employee of a group listed in subsection A of this
section who retires or who has a vested benefit pursuant to the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System may begin the health
insurance coverage if the employer of the employee is not a
participant of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act and
does not offer health insurance to its employees. Such election by
the employee to begin coverage shall be made within thirty (30) days
from the date of termination of service.
2. Any employee of a group listed in subsection A of this
section who retires or who has a vested benefit pursuant to the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System may begin or continue
the health insurance coverage if the employer of the employee is a
participant of the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the election to begin or continue coverage is made within thirty
(30) days from the date of termination of service.
F. Any county, city, town, county hospital, public trust,
conservation district, or rural water, sewer, gas or solid waste
management district, or nonprofit water corporation, any of which of
the aforementioned groups is not a participating employer in the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, but which has employees
who are participating in the health, dental or life insurance plans
offered by or through the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits
Act on July 1, 1997, may continue to allow its current and future
employees to participate in such health, dental or life insurance
plans. Participation of such employees may also continue following
termination of employment if the employee has completed at least
eight (8) years of service with a participating employer and such an
election to continue in force is made within thirty (30) days
following termination of employment. Any retiree or terminated
employee electing coverage pursuant to this section shall pay the
full cost of the insurance.
G. An employee of a group listed in paragraph 2 of subsection A
of this section may continue in force health, dental and life
insurance coverage following termination of employment if the
employee has a minimum of eight (8) years of service with a
participating employer and the election to continue in force is made

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

with in thirty (30) calendar days following termination of
employment.
H. Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, an
employer listed in subsection A of this section may cease to
participate in the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act but
provide health insurance coverage for its current and former
employees through another insurance carrier. The subsequent carrier
shall be responsible for providing coverage to the entity's
employees who terminated employment with a retirement benefit, with
a vested benefit, or who have eight (8) or more years of service
with a participating employer but did not have a vested benefit
through the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, if the
election to retain health insurance coverage was made within thirty
(30) days of termination of employment. Coverage shall also be
provided to the eligible dependents of the employees if an election
to retain coverage is made within thirty (30) days of termination of
employment. Employees who terminate employment from an employer
covered by this paragraph before December 31, 2001, and elect
coverage under the Oklahoma Employees Insurance and Benefits Act,
shall not be required to change insurance carriers in the event that
the employer changes its insurance carrier to a subsequent carrier.
The provisions of this subsection shall become effective January 1,
2002.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

I. Employers pursuant to subsection A of this section who
participate in the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System and
who offer health insurance coverage to their active employees, shall
offer health insurance coverage to those employees who retire from
the employer and also to those employees who terminate employment
and are eligible to elect a vested benefit in the System. Such
employers shall begin offering coverage to such employees on or
before January 1, 2004. Such employees who wish to continue
coverage shall make an election to retain health insurance coverage
within thirty (30) days of termination of employment. However,
former employees of such employers who have already retired or who
have terminated and are eligible to elect a vested benefit under the
Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System, during the period
beginning January 1, 2002, and ending December 31, 2003, may make an
election to begin participation in the plans offered by the Office
on or before December 31, 2003, in the same manner as other
participating retired or vested members. The employer, assisted by
the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System shall notify by
October 1, 2003, all members who have either retired from the System
or who are eligible to elect a vested benefit in the System between
January 1, 2002, through December 31, 2003, and who were employed by
an employer listed in subsection A of this section of the member's
potential eligibility to participate in such plans. Each employer
shall notify the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System when an
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

empl oyee is retiring and makes the election pursuant to this
subsection to continue coverage under a plan offered by such
employer and when an employee terminates employment and is eligible
to elect a vested benefit in the System and such employee elects to
continue coverage under a plan offered by such employer. Such
employer shall also notify the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement
System if a retired employee or an employee who is eligible to elect
a vested benefit in the System terminates such continued coverage.
J. Any group that begins participation in the Oklahoma
Employees Insurance and Benefits Plans after the effective date of
this act March 1, 2004, and that is not composed of state or
education employees must shall have one hundred percent (100%)
participation in the health plan offered pursuant to the Oklahoma
Employees Insurance and Benefits Act.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
April 17, 2025 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2011 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)